Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-9202
Health Care Data Base Advisory Committee;
Nebraska Health Care Data Base.

The Director of Insurance shall appoint the Health Care
Data Base Advisory Committee to make recommendations regarding the creation
and implementation of the Nebraska Health Care Data Base which shall provide
a tool for objective analysis of health care costs and quality, promote transparency
for health care consumers, and facilitate the reporting of health care and
health quality data. The Nebraska Health Care Data Base shall be used to:

(1) Provide information
to consumers and purchasers of health care;

(2) Determine the capacity and distribution of existing
health care resources;

(3) Identify health care needs and inform health care
policy;

(4)
Evaluate the effectiveness of intervention programs on improving patient outcomes;

(5) Review costs
among various treatment settings, providers, and approaches; and

(6) Improve the
quality and affordability of patient health care and health care coverage.

Laws 2014, LB76, § 2.